Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 1. In General

For analysis of 1969 and 1971 amendments to article,

see Inexco Oil Co. v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 490 P.2d 1065,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Royalty Payment Act,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 823 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Gas and oil lease force majeure provisions: construction and effect, 46 ALR4th 976.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in actions involving energy, 77 ALR Fed 541.

§ 30-5-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act unless the context otherwise requires:

The term “waste” means and includes:

Physical waste, as that term is generally understood in the oil and gas industry;

The inefficient, excessive or improper use, or the unnecessary dissipation of, reservoir energy;

The inefficient storing of oil or gas;

The locating, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of any oil or gas well in a manner that causes, or tends to cause, reduction in the quantity of oil or gas ultimately recoverable from a pool under prudent and proper operations, or that causes or tends to cause unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas;

The production of oil or gas in excess of (I) transportation or storage facilities; (II) the amount reasonably required to be produced in the proper drilling, completing, or testing of the well from which it is produced, or oil or gas otherwise usefully utilized: except gas produced from an oil well pending the time when with reasonable diligence the gas can be sold or otherwise usefully utilized on terms and conditions that are just and reasonable;

Underground or aboveground waste in the production or storage of oil, gas, or condensate, however caused, and whether or not defined in other subdivisions hereof;

The flaring of gas from gas wells except that necessary for the drilling, completing or testing of the well; and

The drilling of any well not in conformance to a well density and spacing program fixed by the commission or other agency, state or federal, as to any field or pool during a national emergency when casing or other materials necessary to the drilling and operation of wells are rationed or in short supply.

“Commission” means the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission herein created to carry out the provisions of this act;

The word “pool” shall mean an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of oil or gas, or both. Each zone of a general structure, which zone is completely separated from any other zone in the structure, is covered by the word “pool” as used herein;

“Person” means and includes any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, or other representative of any kind, and includes any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or of any governmental subdivision thereof; the masculine gender, in referring to a person, includes the feminine and the neuter genders;

“Owner” means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from a pool and to appropriate the oil or gas he produces therefrom either for himself or others or for himself and others;

“Producer” means the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas or both;

The word “oil” shall mean crude petroleum oil and any other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravities, which are produced at the well in liquid form by ordinary production methods, and which are not the result of condensation of gas before or after it leaves the reservoir. The word “gas” shall mean all natural gases and all hydrocarbons not defined herein as oil;

The word “and” includes the word “or,” and the use of the word “or” includes the word “and.” The use of the plural includes the singular, and the use of the singular includes the plural;

“Correlative rights” shall mean the opportunity afforded the owner of each property in a pool to produce, so far as it is reasonably practicable to do so without waste, his just and equitable share of the oil or gas, or both, in the pool;

The term “surety bond or other guaranty” means a surety bond, a first priority security interest in a deposit of the proceeds of a collected cashier’s check, a first priority security interest in a certificate of deposit or an irrevocable letter of credit, all in an amount and including other terms, conditions and requirements determined by the commission.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 30-216; Laws 1967, ch. 167, § 1; 1971, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 54, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i)(F), deleted “and” at the end; and in (a)(i)(G) added “and” at the end.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to ch. 94, Laws 1951, compiled (as amended) as §§

30-5-101

to

30-5-104

,

30-5-108

to

30-5-119

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

“Waste” does not include economic waste. —

“Economic waste” is not to be contemplated by statutory definition of “waste” under this section. Larsen v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 569 P.2d 87,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1977).

Powers and duties of commission. —

The department of revenue, acting through the state board of equalization, is vested with pervasive and sole authority over all aspects of the taxation of Wyoming citizens and business entities, including the construction of any statute affecting the assessment, levying, and collection of taxes; the oil and gas commission is empowered to adopt rules and regulations and act administratively to prevent waste and encourage the conservation of Wyoming's oil and gas resources. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Under the statute assigning administrative authority to the Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, there is no power afforded it to adjudicate revenue or taxation issues. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Commission may not base its decisions on tax matters. —

The oil and gas conservation commission must make its decisions and promulgate its orders by its discerning conclusions as to what will either prevent or remediate waste; the commission has no authority to base its decisions on tax matters. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

In invoking § 39-6-302(j) [repealed] as a premise for its decision to not certify a tertiary recovery project, the oil and gas commission acted contrary to law and invaded an area in which it had no statutory right. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Correlative rights and right to produce oil from pool are limited

by a duty not to injure the pool and cause waste. Gilmore v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 642 P.2d 773,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1982); Trout v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 721 P.2d 1047,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 569

(Wyo. 1986).

The correlative rights granted by these provisions are limited. That is, although the owner of each property in a pool has the right to produce its equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool, that right is always subject to the need to prevent waste. Big Piney Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 715 P.2d 557,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1986).

Wyo. Oil and Gas Conservation Commission's findings of fact in
its decision allowing a junior gas producer to inject leftover carbon
dioxide into a geologic formation were inadequate; the decision did
not outline the facts on which it relied to resolve the senior producer's
contention that the plan would cause waste and compromise its correlative
rights under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-101(a)(ix).
Exxon Mobil Corp. v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2013 WY 32, 297 P.3d 782,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

Majority of Working Interest Owners v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 721 P.2d 1070,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 582

(Wyo. 1986); Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(2004).

Quoted

in

Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 446 P.2d 550,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1968); Mitchell v. Simpson, 493 P.2d 399,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1972); Union Pac. Resources Co. v. Texaco, Inc., 882 P.2d 212,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1994); Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Administrative Law—Broader Jurisdiction for the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1986).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 30-5-102.
Waste prohibited; power of commission to allocate allowable production.

The waste of oil and gas or either of them in the state of Wyoming as in this act defined is hereby prohibited.

Whenever in order to prevent waste the commission limits the total amount of oil and gas which may be produced in any pool in this state to an amount less than that amount which the pool could produce if no restriction was imposed, the commission shall allocate or distribute the allowable production among the several wells or producing properties in the pool on a reasonable basis, preventing or minimizing reasonably avoidable drainage from each developed area not equalized by counter-drainage, so that each property will have the opportunity to produce or to receive its just and equitable share, subject to the reasonable necessities for the prevention of waste.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-217; Laws 1967, ch. 167, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Purpose. —

The purpose of this article is to provide a comprehensive regulatory program which prevents the waste of Wyoming's oil and gas resources and protects the correlative rights of property owners. Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Correlative rights and right to produce oil from pool are limited

by a duty not to injure the pool and cause waste. Gilmore v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 642 P.2d 773,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1982).

Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

The correlative rights granted by these provisions are limited. That is, although the owner of each property in a pool has the right to produce its equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool, that right is always subject to the need to prevent waste. Big Piney Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 715 P.2d 557,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1986).

Any party may file complaint of violation before commission.—

Any party is authorized to bring any alleged violation of these provisions before the commission by the filing of a complaint. Big Piney Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 715 P.2d 557,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1986).

Power of Commission does not include adjudication of revenueor taxation issues. —

Under the statute assigning administrative authority to the Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, there is no power afforded it to adjudicate revenue or taxation issues. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land and Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Waste through oil or gas operations on other lands, rights and remedies in respect of, 4 ALR2d 198.

Implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 14.

Remedy for breach of implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 147.

§ 30-5-103.
Oil and gas conservation commission; composition; expenses; hearings; director of oil and gas conservation; legal advisors.

The governor, director of the office of state lands and investments, the state geologist and two (2) additional members from the public at large who shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the consent of the state senate and shall be citizens and residents of the state of Wyoming and shall be qualified to serve the oil and gas industry of this state, shall comprise the commission. The terms of the two (2) members appointed by the governor shall be for two (2) years except that, of the initially appointed members, one (1) designated by the governor, shall serve for one (1) year. The governor may remove any member he appoints as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

.

Each member of the commission not otherwise in full time employment of the state, shall receive the same allowances as other state officials and employees as set forth in W.S.

9-3-102

, as amended while attending and traveling to and from meetings of the commission, said fees and expenses to be paid from the funds of the Wyoming conservation commission.

The governor shall serve as chairman of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. The commission shall meet or hold hearings at such times and places as may be found by the commission to be necessary to carry out its duties. Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

The state oil and gas supervisor shall be ex officio the director of oil and gas conservation, and as such shall be charged with the duty of enforcing this act and all rules, regulations and orders promulgated by the commission. The director of oil and gas conservation with the concurrence of the commission shall have the authority, and it shall be his duty, to employ all personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. The director of oil and gas conservation shall be ex officio secretary of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission and shall keep all minutes and records of the commission.

The attorney general shall be attorney for the commission; provided, that in cases of emergency, the commission may call upon the county attorney for the county of Laramie or the county attorney of the county in which the action is to be brought or defended to represent the commission until such time as the attorney general may take charge of the litigation and upon request, or with the consent of the attorney general, the commission may retain additional counsel to assist the attorney general, and for such purpose may employ any funds available under this act. Any member of the commission, or the secretary thereof, shall have power to administer oaths to any witness in any hearing, investigation, or proceeding contemplated by this act, or by any other law of this state relating to the conservation of oil and gas.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 30-218; Laws 1965, ch. 174, § 1; 1967, ch. 111, § 1; 1971, ch. 27, § 9; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state oil and gas supervisor, see §

30-5-108

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “W.S.

9-3-102

” for “section 9-13, Wyoming Statutes 1957.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under §

30-5-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Interested, nonvoting, member may sign determination. —

Where there were three members of the commission, other than a member with a financial interest, present at all hearings, which satisfied subsection (c), and during the session that person never cast a vote, the due process guarantee of impartiality by fact-finding was satisfied. Admittedly, the interested member signed the final determination, but that fact in itself carried no legal consequence, as it occurred as a ministerial act for entry of the decision made by the actual participants. ANR Prod. Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 800 P.2d 492,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1990).

Stated

in

Union Pac. Resources Co. v. Texaco, Inc., 882 P.2d 212,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land and Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

§ 30-5-104.
Oil and gas conservation commission; powers and duties; investigations; rules and regulations. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, herein called “the commission,” has jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to effectuate the purposes and intent of this act, including the authority to set, assess and collect reasonable fees as provided in this subsection. The fees authorized under this subsection shall be set in accordance with the following:

Fees shall be established by rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Fees shall be established in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates, but does not exceed, the direct and indirect costs of the administrative activity associated with the fee;

The commission shall maintain records sufficient to support the fees charged;

Fees may be imposed only for:

Applications for commission or examiner hearings and for continuances of those hearings;

Applications for administrative approval;

Applications for permits to drill oil and gas wells;

Applications for stratigraphic tests or core holes;

Injection wells subject to the environmental protection agency underground injection control program administered by the commission.

The commission has authority and it is its duty to make investigations to determine whether waste exists or is imminent, or whether other facts exist, which justify or require action by it hereunder. The commission is authorized to enter orders following any investigatory hearings if properly noticed to operators, producers and processors under the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and rules of the commission.

The commission shall make rules, regulations, and orders, and shall take other appropriate action, to effectuate the purposes and intent of this act.

The commission has authority:

To require:

Identification of ownership of wells, producing leases, tanks, plants and drilling structures;

The making and filing of reports, well logs, and directional surveys; provided, however, that logs of exploratory or “wildcat” wells marked confidential shall be kept confidential for six (6) months after the filing thereof, unless the owner gives written permission to release such logs at an earlier date;

The drilling, casing, and plugging of wells in such manner as to prevent the escape of oil or gas out of one (1) stratum into another, the intrusion of water into an oil and gas stratum, the pollution of fresh water supplies by oil, gas, or salt water, and to prevent blowouts, cavings, seepages, and fires;

The furnishing of a surety bond or other guaranty, conditioned for or securing the performance of the duty to plug each dry or abandoned well or the repair of wells causing waste and compliance with the rules and orders of the commission;

The operation of wells with efficient gas-oil and water-oil ratios, and to fix these ratios;

Gauging or other measuring of oil and gas to determine the quantity and quality thereof;

That every person who produces oil or gas in this state shall keep and maintain for a period of five (5) years within this state complete and accurate record of the quantities thereof, which records or certified copies thereof shall be available for examination by the commission or its agents at all reasonable times;

The payment of reasonable fees authorized under this article.

To regulate, for conservation purposes:

The drilling, producing, and plugging of wells;

The shooting and chemical treatment of wells;

The spacing of wells;

Disposal of salt water, nonpotable water, drilling fluids and other oil-field wastes which are uniquely associated with exploration and production operations;

The contamination or waste of underground water;

All aspects of oil mining operations provided that nothing herein shall limit the authority of state mining inspector. “Oil mining operations” means operations associated with the production of oil or gas from reservoir access holes drilled from underground shafts or tunnels.

To classify wells as oil or gas wells for purposes material to the interpretation or enforcement of this act, to make the determination of wells required by the Natural Gas Pricing Policy Act of 1978 [Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978], Public Law 95-621 [15 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3432, 42 U.S.C. § 7255] and to make any other determination of wells that be required by the United States department of energy;

When required, in order to protect correlative rights, to establish drilling units affording each owner an opportunity to drill for and produce as a prudent operator, and so far as it is reasonably practicable to do so without waste, his just and equitable share of the oil or gas or both in the pool and to restrict or limit the production of oil or gas from any well which is allowed, after the effective date of this act, as an exception to the location requirements of or as an additional well permitted under any order of the commission establishing drilling units for a pool or part thereof or of any general well spacing rule or order adopted by the commission for conservation purposes, upon such terms and conditions as the commission may determine, upon the commission’s own motion or upon application of any interested person and after notice and hearing as provided by chapter 6, Wyoming Statutes 1957 [§§

30-5-101

through

30-5-204

], as amended, and by the commission’s rules;

To adopt rules and regulations to:

Regulate the plugging, sealing or capping of seismic shot holes, and to require, and fix the amount of, a surety bond or other guaranty to ensure compliance with regulations governing all geophysical operations and to ensure compliance with W.S.

30-5-401

through

30-5-410

. When oil and gas operations as defined in W.S.

30-5-401

(a)(iv) involve seismic activities, the rules shall require a surety or other guaranty which is sufficient to protect and for the purpose of addressing the interests of the surface owners affected by the activities and which, in all events, shall be in an amount of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for the first one thousand (1,000) acres or portion thereof per surface owner for which access is sought for seismic activities and not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each additional one thousand (1,000) acres or portion thereof per surface owner for which access is sought for seismic activities. For the purpose of assuring compliance with this minimum bonding requirement, the commission may pool parcels of land of different surface owners where no single parcel exceeds forty (40) acres;

Require an applicant to certify that all underground electrical conductors outside of its facilities, fenced enclosures or posted areas comply with the national electric code; and

Require an operator to install and maintain all electrical equipment located in and around an oil and gas well to comply with the national electrical code.

To regulate, excluding discharges permitted under the national pollutant discharge elimination system, the:

Location, construction, operation and reclamation of all noncommercial reserve pits and produced water retention and emergency overflow pits used solely for the storage, treatment and disposal of drilling fluids, produced waters, emergency overflow wastes or other oil field wastes associated with the maintenance and operation of oil and gas exploration and production wells on a lease, unit or communitized area in such a manner as to prevent the contamination of the waters of the state;

Underground disposal into Class two injection wells as defined under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of salt water, nonpotable water and oil field wastes related to oil and gas production in such a manner as to prevent contamination of the waters of the state.

To use funds collected under W.S. 30-5-116(b) to plug wells and seismic holes and reclaim the surrounding area affected by them, if the commission is unable to enforce its regulations and laws requiring the owner, seismic contractor or hole plugger to plug and reclaim and if the owner, seismic contractor or hole plugger does not have an adequate surety bond or other guaranty to cover the cost of plugging and reclamation. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to create any liability by the state for failure to adequately plug or reclaim wells or holes. If oil field equipment appears to have been abandoned in the area of a well or hole which is plugged or reclaimed under this paragraph, the commission may, after notice and a hearing as provided in W.S.

30-5-105

and

30-5-106

and a finding that the equipment is abandoned, dispose of the equipment. The commission may dispose of the equipment by public sale or by transferring it to the contractor who performs the plugging and reclamation for the commission. The transfer or proceeds of the sale shall be used to defray the cost of plugging or reclamation. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement this paragraph;

To issue orders allowing the unitization of pore space associated with geologic sequestration sites pursuant to W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

and adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the purposes of W.S.

35-11-314

;

To issue orders pursuant to W.S.

30-5-110

allowing the unitization of oil and gas interests with consenting coal interests that are actually consumed as a direct result of well and reservoir injections to restore or enhance the microbial conversion of hydrocarbon substrates to methane gas;

After notice and hearing, to order wells shut in and sealed and to prohibit drilling upon written notice from the department of revenue that an owner or operator owes taxes that are more than one hundred twenty (120) days delinquent under W.S.

39-13-113

or 39-14-207(a)(iv) or (v). The commission shall remove any regulation of shutting in or sealing wells or prohibition on drilling issued under this paragraph upon written notice from the department of revenue that the delinquent unpaid taxes have been paid.

The commission shall not require that filings with the commission be signed or stamped by a registered professional engineer.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 30-219; Laws 1969, ch. 139, § 1; 1971, ch. 11, § 3; 1979, ch. 130, § 1; 1984, ch. 3, § 1; 1987, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 233, § 1; 1989, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 265, § 1; 1996, ch. 31, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 54, § 1; 2007, ch. 27, § 1; 2009, ch. 76, § 2; 2011, ch. 50, § 2; 2013 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 151, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

added (d)(v)(B) and (C) and made related changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 27, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 15, 2007.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d)(viii).

The 2011 amendment,

added (d)(ix).

Laws 2011, ch. 50 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (e).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 151, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (d)(v)(A).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d)(vi)(B) substituted “Underground disposal” for “The noncommercial underground disposal.”

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added (d)(x).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023, substituted “35-11-320“ for “35-11-317” in (d)(viii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

The term “this act,” referred to in subsection (d)(iv), means Laws 1979, ch. 130, which appears solely as this section.

Editor's notes. —

The Natural Gas Pricing Policy Act of 1978, cited in paragraph (d)(iii), is referred to as the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978 in the United States Code.

Safe Drinking Water Act. —

The federal Safe Drinking Water Act, referred to in subsection (d)(vi)(B), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.

No jurisdiction to consider civil trespass. —

District court abused its discretion in dismissing a foreign limited partnership’s trespass complaint for failing to exhaust administrative remedies because the exhaustion of administrative remedies doctrine did not apply since the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission did not have jurisdiction under the Oil and Gas Conservation Act to consider a civil trespass; there was no specific administrative process for the partnership to bring a trespass claim to the Commission for consideration. Devon Energy Prod. Co. LP v. Grayson Mill Operating, LLC, 2020 WY 28, 458 P.3d 1201,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2020).

Federal mining and environmental protection laws do not preempt

commission rule or its enabling statute, subsection (d)(ii) of this section, which provide valid authority for the commission to condition permit to drill on national forest land for federally owned minerals in order to prevent unreasonable land surface damage. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985).

Conservation measures are permissible. —

The 1971 amendment made it clear that, in order to prevent waste, conservation measures were permissible. Inexco Oil Co. v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 490 P.2d 1065,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1971).

Correlative rights and right to produce oil from pool are limited

by a duty not to injure the pool and cause waste. Gilmore v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 642 P.2d 773,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1982).

Commission given authority over all persons necessary for effectuation of powers. —

In order to effectuate its powers under subsection (f) of §

30-5-109

, the oil and gas conservation commission was given jurisdiction and authority over all persons necessary for that effectuation. Mitchell v. Simpson, 493 P.2d 399,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1972).

Commission must make findings of fact to support its decisions. —

Wyo. Oil and Gas Conservation Commission's findings of fact in
its decision allowing a junior gas producer to inject leftover carbon
dioxide into a geologic formation were inadequate; the decision did
not outline the facts on which it relied to resolve the senior producer's
contention that the plan would cause waste and compromise its correlative
rights under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 30-5-101(a)(ix).
Exxon Mobil Corp. v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2013 WY 32, 297 P.3d 782,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2013).

Circuit court erred in denying an application to establish a drilling and spacing unit (DSU) because while both applications provided actual, empirical data satisfying the statutory requirements for the establishment of a DSU, the Commission’s approval of one application, but not the other based on its belief that additional data from horizontal development in the subject field was inconsistent treatment of “evidently identical cases” without sufficient reason was arbitrary and capricious. Exaro Energy III, LLC v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2020 WY 8, 455 P.3d 1243,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2020).

Commission not estopped from restricting production through failure to do so in past. —

While the commission has a duty to investigate to determine if waste is occurring, that it failed to do so over an 18-year period did not restrain it from then restricting oil production, under the doctrines of estoppel, waiver or laches. Big Piney Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 715 P.2d 557,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1986).

Majority interest owners may be ordered to shut in wells, or unitize. —

The commission could order majority interest owners to shut in their wells (which might drive some of them out of business) or unitize for secondary recovery operations, in exercising its primary function, the prevention of waste. Majority of Working Interest Owners in Buck Draw Field Area v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 721 P.2d 1070,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 582

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Marathon Oil Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 473 P.2d 575,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1970).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982); Union Pac. Resources Co. v. Texaco, Inc., 882 P.2d 212,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1994); Kerr-McGee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Fieldwide Unitization in Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 433 (1972).

For comment, “Secondary Recovery of Oil and Gas — The Rule of Positive Dominion,” see 9 Land & Water L. Rev. 457 (1974).

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land and Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

For case note, “Administrative Law—Broader Jurisdiction for the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1986).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).